Georgia, session 2025_26, SB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the state employees' health insurance plan, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"45-18-6.2.
(a) On or after July 1, 2025, the board shall not enter into, execute, or renew any contract
or contracts to provide benefits under the plan of health insurance benefits in accordance
with this part with:
S. B. 91
- 1 -

LC 52 0705
(1) Any pharmacy benefits manager that owns or has an ownership interest in any retail
pharmacy; or
(2) Any legal entity that contracts with or uses any pharmacy benefits manager that owns
or has an ownership interest in any retail pharmacy.
(b) This Code section shall not be construed to impair any contracts in existence on
June 30, 2025."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 91
- 2 -